District of Columbia statutes.
16-2391

Relocation.

The permanent guardian shall not relocate with the child over 100 miles from his or her place of residence at the time the guardianship order is entered without filing a notice with the court, which is personally served on all parties, 15 business days before the relocation.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(b), 48 DCR 1637

For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Guardianship Subsidy Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-208, July 27, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 7547).

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).